District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.42

Repealed

Liability of directors in certain cases.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 196, ch. 269, § 42
July 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 241, Pub. L. 86-106, § 9
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-918.
1981 Ed., § 29-342.
2001 Ed., § 29-101.42.